District of Columbia statutes.
9-103.03

Adoption of subdivision by reference.

When any such map shall have been recorded as aforesaid in the Office of the Surveyor of the District it shall be lawful for the owner of any land included within such map to adopt the subdivision thereby made by a reference thereto and to this section in any deed or will which he shall thereafter make, and when any deed or will containing any such reference shall have been made and recorded in the proper office it shall have the same effect as though the grantor or grantors in such deed or the maker of such will had made such subdivision and recorded the same in compliance with law.

Mar. 2, 1893, 27 Stat. 533, ch. 197, § 3
1981 Ed., § 7-109.
1973 Ed., § 7-110.